deutsch_screwed.foma
### deutsch.foma ###

# Short vowels
define SV [a | o | u];

# Long vowels
define LV [ä | ö | ü];

read lexc deutsch.lexc
define Lexicon;

# Convert short to long vowel for the inflection patter kraft
define ShortToLongKraft a -> ä || "^" [e | e n] ,, o -> ö || "^" [e | e n] ,, u -> ü || "^" [e | e n];

# Convert short to long vowel for the inflection pattern mutter
define ShortToLongMutter a -> ä || "^" [1 | n] ,, o -> ö || "^" [1 | n] ,, u -> ü || "^" [1 | n];

# Convert short to long vowel for irregular verbs
define ShortToLongIrregVerbs a -> ä || "&" ,, o -> ö || "&" ,, u -> ü || "&";

# Convert a to u for irregular verb fahren
define AToUIrregVerbs a -> u || "$" ;


# clean added 1 for rules
define CleanOne 1 -> 0;

# clean added $ for rules
define CleanDollar "$" -> 0;

# clean added & for rules
define CleanAmpersand "&" -> 0;

# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Grammar Lexicon .o. 
		ShortToLongKraft .o.
		ShortToLongMutter .o.
		CleanOne .o.
		AtoUIrregVerbs .o.
		CleanDollar .o.
		ShortToLongIrregVerbs .o.
		CleanAmpersand .o.
		Cleanup;

regex Grammar; 
